Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 7. Bylaws
§ 4414.
Zoning; permissible types of regulations.

Any of the following types of regulations may be adopted by a municipality in its bylaws in conformance with the plan and for the purposes established in section 4302 of this title.

Zoning districts. A municipality may define different and separate zoning districts, and identify within these districts which land uses are permitted as of right, and which are conditional uses requiring review and approval, including the districts set forth in this subdivision (1).

Downtown, village center, new town center, and growth center districts. The definition or purpose stated for local downtown, village center, new town center, or growth center zoning districts should conform with the applicable definitions in section 2791 of this title. Municipalities may adopt downtown, village center, new town center, or growth center districts without seeking State designation under chapter 76A of this title. A municipality may adopt a manual of graphic or written design guidelines to assist applicants in the preparation of development applications. The following objectives should guide the establishment of boundaries, requirements, and review standards for these districts:

To create a compact settlement oriented toward pedestrian activity and including an identifiable neighborhood center, with consistently higher densities than those found in surrounding districts.

To provide for a variety of housing types, jobs, shopping, services, and public facilities with residences, shops, workplaces, and public buildings interwoven within the district, all within close proximity.

To create a pattern of interconnecting streets and blocks, consistent with historic settlement patterns, that encourages multiple routes from origins to destinations.

To provide for a coordinated transportation system with a hierarchy of appropriately designed facilities for pedestrians, bicycles, public transit, and automotive vehicles.

To provide for natural features and undisturbed areas that are incorporated into the open space of the neighborhood as well as historically compatible squares, greens, landscaped streets, and parks woven into the pattern of the neighborhood.

To provide for public buildings, open spaces, and other visual features that act as landmarks, symbols, and focal points for community identity.

To ensure compatibility of buildings and other improvements as determined by their arrangement, building bulk, form, design, character, and landscaping to establish a livable, harmonious, and diverse environment.

To provide for public and private buildings that form a consistent, distinct edge, are oriented toward streets, and define the border between the public street space and the private block interior.

Agricultural, rural residential, forest, and recreational districts. Where, for the purposes set forth in section 4302 of this title, it is deemed necessary to safeguard certain areas from urban or suburban development and to encourage that development in other areas of the municipality or region, the following districts may be created:

Agricultural or rural residential districts, permitting all types of agricultural uses and prohibiting all other land development except low density residential development.

Forest districts, permitting commercial forestry and related uses and prohibiting all other land development.

Recreational districts, permitting camps, ski areas, and related recreational facilities, including lodging for transients and seasonal residents, and prohibiting all other land development except construction of residences for occupancy by caretakers and their families.

Airport hazard area. In accordance with 5 V.S.A. chapter 17, any municipality may adopt special bylaws governing the use of land, location, and size of buildings and density of population within a distance of two miles from the boundaries of an airport under an approach zone and for a distance of one mile from the boundaries of the airport elsewhere. The designation of that area and the bylaws applying within that area shall be in accord with applicable airport zoning guidelines, if any, adopted by the Vermont Transportation Board.

Shorelands.

A municipality may adopt bylaws to regulate shorelands as defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1422

to prevent and control water pollution; preserve and protect wetlands and other terrestrial and aquatic wildlife habitat; conserve the scenic beauty of shorelands; minimize shoreline erosion; reserve public access to public waters; and achieve other municipal, regional, or State shoreland conservation and development objectives.

Shoreland bylaws may regulate the design and maintenance of sanitary facilities; regulate filling of and other adverse alterations to wetlands and other wildlife habitat areas; control building location; require the provision and maintenance of vegetation; require provisions for access to public waters for all residents and owners of the development; and impose other requirements authorized by this chapter.

Design review districts. Bylaws may contain provisions for the establishment of design review districts. Prior to the establishment of such a district, the planning commission shall prepare a report describing the particular planning and design problems of the proposed district and setting forth a design plan for the areas which shall include recommended planning and design criteria to guide future development. The planning commission shall hold a public hearing, after public notice, on that report. After this hearing, the planning commission may recommend to the legislative body a design review district as a bylaw amendment. A design review district may be created for any area containing structures of historical, architectural, or cultural merit, and other areas in which there is a concentration of community interest and participation such as a central business district, civic center, or a similar grouping or focus of activities. These areas may include townscape areas that resemble in important aspects the earliest permanent settlements, including a concentrated urban settlement with striking vistas, views extending across open fields and up to the forest edge, a central focal point and town green, and buildings of high architectural quality, including styles of the early 19th century. Within such a designated design review district, no structure may be erected, reconstructed, substantially altered, restored, moved, demolished, or changed in use or type of occupancy without approval of the plans by the appropriate municipal panel. A design review board may be appointed by the legislative body of the municipality, in accordance with section 4433 of this title, to advise any appropriate municipal panel.

Local historic districts and landmarks.

Bylaws may contain provisions for the establishment of historic districts and the designation of historic landmarks. Historic districts shall include structures and areas of historic or architectural significance and may include distinctive design or landscape characteristics, areas, and structures with a particular relationship to the historic and cultural values of the surrounding area, and structures whose exterior architectural features bear a significant relationship to the remainder of the structures or to the surrounding area. Bylaws may reference National and State Registers of Historic Places, properties, and districts. A report prepared under section 4441 of this title with respect to the establishment of a local historic district or designation of an historic landmark shall contain a map that clearly delineates the boundaries of the local historic district or landmark, justification for the boundary, a description of the elements of the resources that are integral to its historical, architectural, and cultural significance, and a statement of the significance of the local historic district or landmark.

With respect to external appearances and other than normal maintenance, no structure within a designated historic district may be rehabilitated, substantially altered, restored, moved, demolished, or changed, and no new structure within an historic district may be erected without approval of the plans therefor by the appropriate municipal panel. The panel shall consider the following in its review of plans submitted:

The historic or architectural significance of the structure, its distinctive characteristics, and its relationship to the historic significance of the surrounding area.

The relationship of the proposed changes in the exterior architectural features of the structure to the remainder of the structure and to the surrounding area.

The general compatibility of the proposed exterior design, arrangement, texture, and materials proposed to be used.

Any other factors, including the environmental setting and aesthetic factors that the panel deems to be pertinent.

When an appropriate municipal panel is reviewing an application relating to an historic district, the panel:

Shall be strict in its judgment of plans for those structures deemed to be valuable under subdivision (1)(F)(i) of this section, but is not required to limit new construction, alteration, or repairs to the architectural style of any one period, but may encourage compatible new design.

If an application is submitted for the alteration of the exterior appearance of a structure or for the moving or demolition of a structure deemed to be significant under subdivision (1)(F)(i) of this section, shall meet with the owner of the structure to devise an economically feasible plan for the preservation of the structure.

Shall approve an application only when the panel is satisfied that the proposed plan will not materially impair the historic or architectural significance of the structure or surrounding area.

In the case of a structure deemed to be significant under subdivision (1)(F)(i) of this section, may approve the proposed alteration despite subdivision (1)(F)(ii)(III) of this section if the panel finds either or both of the following:

The structure is a deterrent to a major improvement program that will be of clear and substantial benefit to the municipality.

Retention of the structure would cause undue financial hardship to the owner.

This subdivision (1)(F), and bylaws issued pursuant to it, shall apply to designation of individual landmarks as well as to designation of local historic districts. A landmark is any individual building, structure, or site that by itself has a special historic, architectural, or cultural value.

The provisions of this subdivision (1)(F) shall not in any way apply to or affect buildings, structures, or land within the “Capitol complex,” as defined in 29 V.S.A. chapter 6.

River corridors and buffers. In accordance with section 4424 of this title, a municipality may adopt bylaws to protect river corridors and buffers, as those terms are defined in

10 V.S.A. §§ 1422

and 1427, in order to protect public safety; prevent and control water pollution; prevent and control stormwater runoff; preserve and protect wetlands and waterways; maintain and protect natural channel, streambank, and floodplain stability; minimize fluvial erosion and damage to property and transportation infrastructure; preserve and protect the habitat of terrestrial and aquatic wildlife; promote open space and aesthetics; and achieve other municipal, regional, or State conservation and development objectives for river corridors and buffers. River corridor and buffer bylaws may regulate the design and location of development; control the location of buildings; require the provision and maintenance or reestablishment of vegetation, including no net loss of vegetation; require screening of development or use from waters; reserve existing public access to public waters; and impose other requirements authorized by this chapter.

Overlay districts. Special districts may be created to supplement or modify the zoning requirements otherwise applicable in underlying districts in order to provide supplementary provisions for areas such as shorelands and floodplains, aquifer and source protection areas, ridgelines and scenic features, highway intersection, bypass, and interchange areas, or other features described in section 4411 of this title.

Conditional uses.

In any district, certain uses may be allowed only by approval of the appropriate municipal panel, if general and specific standards to which each allowed use must conform are prescribed in the appropriate bylaws and if the appropriate municipal panel, under the procedures in subchapter 10 of this chapter, determines that the proposed use will conform to those standards. These general standards shall require that the proposed conditional use shall not result in an undue adverse effect on any of the following:

The capacity of existing or planned community facilities.

The character of the area affected, as defined by the purpose or purposes of the zoning district within which the project is located, and specifically stated policies and standards of the municipal plan.

Traffic on roads and highways in the vicinity.

Bylaws and ordinances then in effect.

Utilization of renewable energy resources.

The general standards set forth in subdivision (3)(A) of this section may be supplemented by more specific criteria, including requirements with respect to any of the following:

Minimum lot size.

Distance from adjacent or nearby uses.

Performance standards, as under subdivision (5) of this section.

Criteria adopted relating to site plan review pursuant to section 4416 of this title.

Any other standards and factors that the bylaws may include.

One or more of the review criteria found in

10 V.S.A. § 6086

may be adopted as standards for use in conditional use review.

A multiunit dwelling project consisting of four or fewer units located in a district allowing multiunit dwellings may not be denied solely due to an undue adverse effect on the character of the area affected.

Parking and loading facilities. A municipality may adopt provisions setting forth standards for permitted and required facilities for off-street parking and loading which may vary by district and by uses within each district. These bylaws may also include provisions covering the location, size, design, access, landscaping, and screening of those facilities. In determining the number and size of parking spaces required under these regulations, the appropriate municipal panel may take into account the existence or availability of employer “transit pass” and rideshare programs, public transit routes, and public parking spaces in the vicinity of the development.

Performance standards. As an alternative or supplement to the listing of specific uses permitted in districts, including those in manufacturing or industrial districts, bylaws may specify acceptable standards or levels of performance that will be required in connection with any use. These bylaws shall specifically describe the levels of operation that are acceptable and not likely to affect adversely the use of the surrounding area by the emission of such dangerous or objectionable elements as noise, vibration, smoke, dust, odor, or other form of air pollution, heat, cold, dampness, electromagnetic, or other disturbance, glare, liquid, or solid refuse or wastes; or create any dangerous, injurious, noxious, fire, explosive, or other hazard. The land planning policies and development bylaws manual prepared pursuant to section 4304 of this title shall contain recommended forms of alternative performance standards, and the assistance of the Agency of Commerce and Community Development shall be available to any municipality that requests aid in the application or enforcement of these bylaws.

Access to renewable energy resources. Any municipality may adopt zoning and subdivision bylaws to encourage energy conservation and to protect and provide access to, among others, the collection or conversion of direct sunlight, wind, running water, organically derived fuels, including wood and agricultural sources, waste heat, and geothermal sources, including those recommendations contained in the adopted municipal plan, regional plan, or both. The bylaw shall establish a standard of review in conformance with the municipal plan provisions required pursuant to subdivision 4382(a)(9) of this title.

Inclusionary zoning. In order to provide for affordable housing, bylaws may require that a certain percentage of housing units in a proposed subdivision, planned unit development, or multi-unit development meets defined affordability standards, which may include lower income limits than contained in the definition of “affordable housing” in subdivision 4303(1) of this title and may contain different affordability percentages than contained in the definition of “affordable housing development” in subdivision 4303(2) of this title. These provisions, at a minimum, shall comply with all the following:

Be in conformance with specific policies of the housing element of the municipal plan.

Be determined from an analysis of the need for affordable rental and sale housing units in the community.

Include development incentives that contribute to the economic feasibility of providing affordable housing units, such as density bonuses, reductions or waivers of minimum lot, dimensional or parking requirements, reductions or waivers of applicable fees, or reductions or waivers of required public or nonpublic improvements.

Require, through conditions of approval, that once affordable housing is built, its availability will be maintained through measures that establish income qualifications for renters or purchasers, promote affirmative marketing, and regulate the price, rent, and resale price of affordable units for a time period specified in the bylaws.

Waivers.

A bylaw may allow a municipality to grant waivers to reduce dimensional requirements, in accordance with specific standards that shall be in conformance with the plan and the goals set forth in section 4302 of this title. These standards may:

allow mitigation through design, screening, or other remedy;

allow waivers for structures providing for disability accessibility, fire safety, and other requirements of law; and

provide for energy conservation and renewable energy structures.

If waivers from dimensional requirements are provided, the bylaws shall specify the process by which these waivers may be granted and appealed.

Stormwater management and control. Any municipality may adopt bylaws to implement stormwater management and control consistent with the program developed by the Secretary of Natural Resources pursuant to

10 V.S.A. § 1264

.

Time-share projects. The bylaws may require that time-share projects consisting of five or more time-share estates or licenses be subject to development review.

Archaeological resources. A municipality may adopt bylaws for the purpose of regulating archaeological sites and areas that may contain significant archaeological sites to make progress toward attaining the goals in the municipal plan concerning the protection of archaeological sites.

Wireless telecommunications facilities and ancillary improvements. A municipality may adopt bylaws to regulate wireless telecommunications facilities and ancillary improvements in a manner consistent with State or federal law. These bylaws may include requiring the decommissioning or dismantling of wireless telecommunications facilities and ancillary improvements, and may establish requirements that a bond be posted, or other security acceptable to the legislative body, in order to finance facility decommissioning or dismantling activities.

Wastewater and potable water supply systems. A municipality may adopt bylaws that:
(13) (A) Wastewater and potable water supply systems. A municipality may adopt bylaws that:

prohibit the initiation of construction under a zoning permit unless and until a wastewater and potable water supply permit is issued under 10 V.S.A. chapter 64; or

establish an application process for a zoning or subdivision permit, under which an applicant may submit a permit application for municipal review, and the municipality may condition the issuance of a final permit upon issuance of a wastewater and potable water supply permit under 10 V.S.A. chapter 64.

For purposes of an appeal of a permit issued under a bylaw adopted under this subdivision (13), the appealable decision of the municipality shall be the issuance or denial of a final zoning or subdivision permit and not the requirement to condition issuance of a permit on issuance of a wastewater and potable water supply permit under 10 V.S.A. chapter 64.

Green development incentives. A municipality may encourage the use of low-embodied energy in construction materials, planned neighborhood developments that allow for reduced use of fuel for transportation, and increased use of renewable technology by providing for regulatory incentives, including increased densities and expedited review.

Solar plants; screening. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of sections 2291a and 4413 of this title or 30 V.S.A. chapter 5 or 89, a municipality may adopt a freestanding bylaw to establish screening requirements that shall apply to a ground-mounted plant that generates electricity from solar energy. In a proceeding under

30 V.S.A. § 248

, the municipality may make recommendations to the Public Utility Commission applying the bylaw to such a plant. The bylaw may designate the municipal body to make this recommendation. Screening requirements and recommendations adopted under this subdivision shall be a condition of a certificate of public good issued for the plant under

30 V.S.A. § 248

, provided that they do not prohibit or have the effect of prohibiting the installation of such a plant and do not have the effect of interfering with its intended functional use.

Screening requirements under this subdivision shall not be more restrictive than screening requirements applied to commercial development in the municipality under this chapter or, if the municipality does not have other bylaws except flood hazard, 10 V.S.A. chapter 151.

In this section, “plant” shall have the same meaning as in

30 V.S.A. § 8002

and “screening” means reasonable aesthetic mitigation measures to harmonize a facility with its surroundings and includes landscaping, vegetation, fencing, and topographic features.

This subdivision (15) shall not authorize requiring a municipal land use permit for a solar electric generation plant, and a municipal action under this subdivision shall not be subject to the provisions of subchapter 11 (appeals) of this chapter. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this title, enforcement of a bylaw adopted under this subdivision shall be pursuant to the provisions of

30 V.S.A. § 30

applicable to violations of 30 V.S.A. § 248.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95; amended

2005, No. 183

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2007, No. 32

, § 4;

2007, No. 79

, § 15;

2007, No. 32

, § 4a, eff. May 18, 2007;

2007, No. 79

, § 15a, eff. June 9, 2007;

2007, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2009, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2009, No. 145

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 1, 2010;

2013, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 14, eff. June 1, 2014;

2015, No. 56

, § 26d, eff. June 11, 2015;

2019, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Oct. 12, 2020.

§ 4415.
Interim bylaws.

If a municipality is conducting or has taken action to conduct studies, or has held or is holding a hearing for the purpose of considering a bylaw, a comprehensive plan, or an amendment, extension, or addition to a bylaw or plan, the legislative body may adopt interim bylaws regulating land development in all or a part of the municipality in order to protect the public health, safety, and general welfare and provide for orderly physical and economic growth. These interim bylaws shall be adopted, reenacted, extended, or amended by the legislative body of the municipality after public hearing upon public notice as an emergency measure. They shall be limited in duration to two years from the date they become effective and may be extended or reenacted only in accordance with subsections (f) and (g) of this section. An interim bylaw adopted under this section may be repealed after public hearing, upon public notice by the legislative body. The legislative body, upon petition of five percent of the legal voters filed with the clerk of the municipality, shall hold a public hearing for consideration of amendment or repeal of the interim bylaws.

An interim bylaw adopted, extended, or reenacted under this section may contain any provision authorized under this chapter.

Interim bylaws shall be administered and enforced in accordance with the provisions of this title applicable to the administration and enforcement of permanent bylaws, except that uses other than those permitted by an interim bylaw may be authorized as provided for in subsection (d) of this section.

Under interim bylaws, the legislative body may, upon application, authorize the issuance of permits for any type of land development as a conditional use not otherwise permitted by the bylaw after public hearing preceded by notice in accordance with section 4464 of this title. The authorization by the legislative body shall be granted only upon a finding by the body that the proposed use is consistent with the health, safety, and welfare of the municipality and the standards contained in subsection (e) of this section. The applicant and all abutting property owners shall be notified in writing of the date of the hearing and of the legislative body’s final determination.

In making a determination, the legislative body shall consider the proposed use with respect to all the following:

The capacity of existing or planned community facilities, services, or lands.

The existing patterns and uses of development in the area.

Environmental limitations of the site or area and significant natural resource areas and sites.

Municipal plans and other municipal bylaws, ordinances, or regulations in effect.

The legislative body of the municipality may extend or reenact interim bylaws for a one-year period beyond the initial two-year period authorized by subsection (a) of this section in accordance with the procedures for adoption in that subsection.

A copy of the adopted, amended, reenacted, or extended interim bylaw shall be sent to adjoining towns, to the regional planning commission of the region in which the municipality is located, and to the Agency of Commerce and Community Development.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4416.
Site plan review.

As prerequisite to the approval of any use other than one- and two-family dwellings, the approval of site plans by the appropriate municipal panel may be required, under procedures set forth in subchapter 10 of this chapter. In reviewing site plans, the appropriate municipal panel may impose, in accordance with the bylaws, appropriate conditions and safeguards with respect to the adequacy of parking, traffic access, and circulation for pedestrians and vehicles; landscaping and screening; the protection of the utilization of renewable energy resources; exterior lighting; the size, location, and design of signs; and other matters specified in the bylaws. The bylaws shall specify the maps, data, and other information to be presented with applications for site plan approval and a review process pursuant to section 4464 of this title.

Whenever a proposed site plan involves access to a State highway or other work in the State highway right-of-way such as excavation, grading, paving, or utility installation, the application for site plan approval shall include a letter from the Agency of Transportation confirming that the Agency has reviewed the proposed site plan and determined whether a permit is required under

19 V.S.A. § 1111

. If the Agency determines that a permit for the proposed site plan is required under

19 V.S.A. § 1111

, then the letter from the Agency shall set out any conditions that the Agency proposes to attach to the permit required under 19 V.S.A. § 1111.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95; amended

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 29;

2021, No. 55

, § 36.

§ 4417.
Planned unit development.

Any municipality adopting a bylaw should provide for planned unit developments to permit flexibility in the application of land development regulations for the purposes of section 4302 of this title and in conformance with the municipal plan. The following may be purposes for planned unit development bylaws:

To encourage compact, pedestrian-oriented development and redevelopment, and to promote a mix of residential uses or nonresidential uses, or both, especially in downtowns, village centers, new town centers, and associated neighborhoods.

To implement the policies of the municipal plan, such as the provision of affordable housing.

To encourage any development in the countryside to be compatible with the use and character of surrounding rural lands.

To provide for flexibility in site and lot layout, building design, placement and clustering of buildings, use of open areas, provision of circulation facilities, including pedestrian facilities and parking, and related site and design considerations that will best achieve the goals for the area as articulated in the municipal plan and bylaws within the particular character of the site and its surroundings.

To provide for the conservation of open space features recognized as worthy of conservation in the municipal plan and bylaws, such as the preservation of agricultural land, forest land, trails, and other recreational resources, critical and sensitive natural areas, scenic resources, and protection from natural hazards.

To provide for efficient use of public facilities and infrastructure.

To encourage and preserve opportunities for energy-efficient development and redevelopment.

The application of planned unit development bylaws to a proposed development may:

Involve single or multiple properties and one owner or multiple owners. Procedures for application and review of multiple owners or properties under a common application, if allowed, shall be specified in the bylaws.

Be limited to parcels that have a minimum area specified in the bylaws or a minimum size or number of units.

Be mandatory for land located in specified zoning districts or for projects of a specified type or magnitude as provided in the bylaws.

Planned unit development bylaws adopted pursuant to this section at a minimum shall include the following provisions:

A statement of purpose in conformance with the purposes of the municipal plan and bylaws.

The development review process to be used for review of planned unit developments to include conditional use or subdivision review procedures, or both, as specified in the bylaws.

Specifications, or reference to specifications, for all application documents and plan drawings.

Standards for the review of proposed planned unit developments, which may vary the density or intensity of land use otherwise applicable under the provisions of the bylaws in consideration of and with respect to any of the following:

The location and physical characteristics of the proposed planned unit development.

The location, design, type, and use of the lots and structures proposed.

The amount, location, and proposed use of open space.

Standards requiring related public improvements or nonpublic improvements, or both; and the payment of impact fees, incorporating by reference any development impact fee ordinance adopted pursuant to chapter 131 of this title.

Provisions for the proposed planned unit development to be completed in reasonable phases, in accordance with the municipal plan and any capital budget and program.

Provisions for coordinating the planned unit development review with other applicable zoning or subdivision review processes, specifying the sequence in which the various review standards will be considered.

Reviews that are conducted in accordance with the procedures in subchapter 10 of this chapter.

Planned unit development bylaws may provide for, as part of the standards described in subdivisions (c)(4) and (c)(5) of this section, the authorization of uses, densities, and intensities that do not correspond with or are not otherwise expressly permitted by the bylaws for the area in which a planned unit development is located, provided that the municipal plan contains a policy that encourages mixed use development, development at higher overall densities or intensities, or both.

Standards for the reservation or dedication of common land or other open space for the use or benefit of the residents of the proposed planned unit development shall include provisions for determining the amount and location of that common land or open space, and for ensuring its improvement and maintenance.

The bylaws may provide that the municipality may, at any time, accept the dedication of land or any interest in land for public use and maintenance.

The bylaws may require that the applicant or landowner provide for and establish an organization or trust for the ownership and maintenance of any common facilities or open space, and that this organization or trust shall not be dissolved or revoked nor shall it dispose of any common open space, by sale or otherwise, except to an organization or trust conceived and established to own and maintain the common open space, without first offering to dedicate the same to the municipality or other governmental agency to maintain those common facilities or that open space.

The approval of a proposed planned unit development shall be based on findings by the appropriate municipal panel that the proposed planned unit development is in conformance with the municipal plan and satisfies other requirements of the bylaws.

The appropriate municipal panel may prescribe, from time to time, rules and regulations to supplement the standards and conditions set forth in the zoning bylaws, provided the rules and regulations are not inconsistent with any municipal bylaw. The panel shall hold a public hearing after public notice, as required by section 4464 of this title, prior to the enactment of any supplementary rules and regulations.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4418.
Subdivision bylaws.

In order to guide community settlement patterns and to ensure the efficient extension of services, utilities, and facilities as land is developed, a municipality may regulate the division of a lot or parcel of land into two or more lots or other division of land for sale, development, or lease. Subdivision bylaws shall establish standards and procedures for approval, modification, or disapproval of plats of land and approval or modification of plats previously filed in the office of the municipal clerk or land records.

Subdivision bylaws shall be administered in accordance with the requirements of subchapter 10 of this chapter, and shall contain:

Procedures and requirements for the design, submission, and processing of plats, any drawing and plans, and any other documentation required for review of subdivisions.

Standards for the design and layout of streets, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, streetlights, fire hydrants, landscaping, water, sewage and stormwater management facilities, public and private utilities, and other necessary improvements as may be specified in a municipal plan. Standards in accordance with subdivision 4412(3) of this title shall be required for lots without frontage on or access to public roads or public waters.

Standards for the design and configuration of parcel boundaries and location of associated improvements necessary to implement the municipal plan and achieve the desired settlement pattern for the neighborhood, area, or district in which the subdivision is located.

Standards for the protection of natural resources and cultural features and the preservation of open space, as appropriate in the municipality.

Subdivision bylaws may include:

Provisions allowing the appropriate municipal panel to waive or modify, subject to appropriate conditions, the provision of any or all improvements and requirements as in its judgment of the special circumstances of a particular plat or plats are not requisite in the interest of the public health, safety, and general welfare, or are inappropriate because of inadequacy or lack of connecting facilities adjacent or in proximity to the subdivision.

Procedures for conceptual, preliminary, partial, and other reviews preceding submission of a subdivision plat, including any administrative reviews.

Specific development standards to promote the conservation of energy or to permit the utilization of renewable energy resources, or both.

State standards and criteria under

10 V.S.A. § 6086(a)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.

§ 4419.
Unified development bylaws.

Any bylaws authorized under this chapter may be integrated into a unified land development bylaw that combines the separate requirements into a consolidated review and permitting process. At a minimum, unified development bylaws shall consolidate zoning and subdivision bylaws. Unified development bylaws should incorporate other bylaws in conformance with this chapter and should cross reference all ordinances adopted by a municipality pursuant to authority outside this chapter that affect land development. Unified development bylaws shall provide for an orderly permitting process for all applicable regulations, in accordance with subchapters 10 and 11 of this chapter.

Any municipality that has adopted unified development bylaws in conformance with the requirements of sections 4410, 4411, 4412, 4413, and 4417 of this title shall be deemed to have adopted permanent zoning and subdivision regulations in accordance with

10 V.S.A. § 6001(3)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 95.